Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 4. Auditor and Treasurer

§ 9-1-401.
Seals of office; access to records; power to administer oaths; accounting records.

The treasurer and auditor shall each:

Keep a seal of office, which shall be used to authenticate all writings, papers and documents certified by either officer;

Have free access to each other’s offices and to all other offices of the state to inspect books, accounts and papers pertaining to their duties;

Have power to administer oaths and affirmations required by law in matters touching their duties;

Balance their accounting records to verify that cash and investments, adjusted for outstanding warrants, reflect the amount due to each fund and account in the Wyoming uniform accounting system.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part I, § 6; Part V, §§ 1, 17; R.S. 1887, §§ 1691, 1714, 1729; R.S. 1899, §§ 2, 174, 176; C.S. 1910, §§ 255, 256, 258; C.S. 1920, §§ 295, 296, 298; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-1405, 109-1406, 109-1408; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-504, 18-514, 18-526; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-52, 9-54, 9-56; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-302,

9-2-303

, 9-2-305; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-1-402.
State auditor; duties generally.

The state auditor is the comptroller, chief accountant and the official custodian of the state’s accounting records, accounts, vouchers, documents and all papers relating to the accounts and contracts of the state and its revenue, debt and fiscal affairs not required by law to be kept by another office. State agencies or officers certifying payments may retain the documents required under this section, subject to any rules and regulations promulgated by the state auditor with respect to acceptable documentation, certification and retention.

The state auditor shall serve as the chief fiscal control officer of the state of Wyoming, shall maintain the state’s central fiscal accounts, and shall order all payments into and out of the funds held by the state treasurer.

The state auditor shall be the state payroll officer, shall maintain the official payroll for all state agencies, excluding the University of Wyoming, and shall supervise the issuance of all payroll warrants. The state auditor may enter into agreement with any state agency to maintain the official payroll and supervise issuance of all payroll warrants for the state agency.

The state auditor may approve an alternative to the use of warrants drawn by the state auditor for the disbursement of retirement system benefits, provided that the attorney general reviews the legality of the alternative.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part II, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1693; Laws 1888, ch. 64, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 72; C.S. 1910, § 109; C.S. 1920, § 119; R.S. 1931, § 109-303; C.S. 1945, § 18-301; W.S. 1957, § 9-68; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-330; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1992, ch. 41, § 1; 1999, ch. 189, § 1; 2021 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (d).

§ 9-1-403.
State auditor; duties; prohibited acts; powers; investigative subpoenas.

The state auditor shall:

Audit and settle all claims against the state payable out of the treasury excluding claims required by law to be audited and settled by other officers and persons. Before settling claims under this paragraph, the state auditor shall:

Require state agencies to have procedures in place to ensure that:

The claims have been properly approved by a competent authority; and

The state agency has charged the claim to the appropriate state account.

Verify that the state agency responsible for the claim has received the funding necessary from the legislature.

Draw all warrants upon the treasurer for money unless otherwise provided by law;

Except as provided by law, cause prosecution of persons failing to remit public money or property to the state and debtors of the state;

Be authorized to cooperate with the federal government, other states and interested persons regarding federal royalty management, including site inspection and audit activities, to ensure the state is receiving the proper amount of federal and state mineral royalty entitlements, except that commencing July 1, 1989, the department of audit shall exercise this authority;

Provide an annual financial report of the fiscal affairs of the state to the governor, president of the senate, speaker of the house and cochairmen of the joint appropriations committee, on or before December 31 of each year. The report shall include financial statements which shall be prepared, insofar as practical, in conformance with generally accepted accounting principles;

When any person is entitled to a warrant or other payment from the treasury, against whom there is a due and payable account or claim in favor of the state, upon notification thereof, ascertain the amount due and payable to the state, and draw a warrant on the balance. The state auditor may deduct the entire amount due and payable to the state or may deduct a portion of the amount due and payable to the state;

Whenever he refuses to draw a warrant pursuant to any voucher, return the voucher together with a written statement of the reasons for his disapproval to the agency which transmitted the voucher, and retain a record of the disapproved voucher;

On or before the fifteenth day of each month, make available in electronic or hard copy detailed statements of expenditures and revenues for each state entity that receives an appropriation in accordance with budget classification. These statements shall be available to each entity and to the state budget department.

The state auditor shall not draw warrants:

In excess of amounts appropriated except as otherwise provided by law;

For the keeping or transporting of prisoners except on accounts certified under oath naming the prisoners, stating the time each prisoner has been kept, stating the distance the prisoner was transported;

For items furnished or services rendered except on itemized accounts or vouchers certified under penalty of perjury by the vendor or by an authorized person employed by the agency receiving the items or for whom the services were rendered showing the date each item was furnished or service rendered by the vendor. The certification and documentation required under this paragraph may be provided to the state auditor by the state official employed by the agency receiving the items or services by electronic or other acceptable media in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the state auditor;

Unless the individual state agency provides documentation and certification that the bill, invoice, account, payroll or other evidence of the claim, demand or charge is satisfactory to the state auditor with respect to the regularity, legality and correctness of the expenditure or disbursement, and that the claim, demand or charge has not been previously paid. If he is satisfied, he shall approve the claim, demand or charge, subject to audit at the discretion of the state auditor after processing the warrant using acceptable auditing techniques. The state auditor may, by general rule or special order, require certification or evidence as the circumstances may demand;

For payment on a contract for professional consultant or other services unless the agency has certified that the contract for the services has been reduced to writing before the services are performed, and that the contract is in compliance with procedures of the attorney general, is approved by the attorney general, and, except for contracts for capital construction projects entered into by an agency under W.S.

9-2-3006

and contracts of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) or less which are entered into by the office of an elected state official, is filed with and approved by the department of administration and information. For payment on a contract for professional or other services entered into by the department of transportation, filing of the contract with and approval by the department of administration and information and approval by the attorney general is not required, however the attorney general shall first review the contract if the contract is over twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00);

For payment of salaries or wages for state officials or employees before the completion of the period for which the compensation is being paid. Effective July 1, 2013, all salary and wage payments to persons employed by the state of Wyoming, other than the University of Wyoming, shall be made by:

Direct deposit;

Warrant;

Debit card or other type of pay card; or

Any combination of the methods identified in this paragraph.

If the auditor elects to make payment to state employees using a debit card or other type of pay card authorized under paragraph (vi) of this subsection, any contract the auditor enters into with a card issuer shall require the issuer to provide the benefits of deposit insurance offered by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. The auditor’s contract with the card issuer also shall provide each employee using a debit or other pay card one (1) or more free withdrawals per pay period at a banking institution or in-network automatic teller machine and shall prohibit the extension of credit and the use of overdrafts;

For payment on a contract for capital construction projects entered into by an agency under W.S.

9-2-3006

unless the agency has certified that the contract for the project has been reduced to writing before the contract is performed, that the contract is in compliance with procedures of the attorney general, is approved by the attorney general and is filed with and approved by the state construction department.

The state auditor may:

Audit, settle and adjust the accounts of state officers and employees who are required by law to collect state revenue and pay it into the treasury;

Keep an account of any separate fund in the state authorized by law and of all debts and credits between the state and the United States, other states or persons;

Delegate to individual state agencies the responsibility for preauditing vouchers. The state agencies to which the responsibility is delegated shall perform the preaudit function. The state auditor may specify reasonable conditions and limitations upon any delegation under this subsection and may rescind a delegation at any time upon reasonable notice in writing to the agency;

Prescribe and require the use by state agencies, of forms for all documents required by law in the performance of his duties or which he may reasonably require therefor. The state auditor may, when he deems it advisable for the promotion of efficiency in state government, accept vouchers, invoices, document images or signatures on electronic or other appropriate media, as prescribed by rules and regulations of the state auditor;

Issue wire transfers, electronic transfer of funds or other acceptable payment methods, in lieu of warrants, for the payment of goods or services, provided requests for the wire transfers are itemized accounts or vouchers certified under penalty of perjury by the vendor and approved in the same manner and procedure as followed in the preparation of warrant requests as set forth in paragraph (b)(iii) of this section;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 189, § 2.

Notwithstanding paragraph (b)(iii) of this section, the state auditor may draw a warrant for prepayment for goods or services when it is beneficial for the state to pay in advance of receipt of the goods or services;

Employ legal counsel to review contracts entered into by the state auditor in his official capacity and perform other duties as assigned by the state auditor. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits the state auditor from using the services of the attorney general’s office;

Notwithstanding W.S. 27-4-101(b), provide to state employees who are paid through the uniform accounting and payroll system the information required by W.S. 27-4-101(b):

In writing;

By electronic means; or

By any other means which supplies the required information in a form that the employee can retain in written form.

For purposes of any financial investigation or review of any agency program or activity funded in whole or in part with state funds, the attorney general, at the request of the state auditor, may:

Subpoena witnesses to appear before the state auditor for oral examination;

Require the production or disclosure of any matter relevant to the investigation or review including:

The existence, description, nature, custody, condition and location of any books, documents, records or other tangible material; and

The identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of evidence necessary or related to the financial investigation or review.

If any tangible materials subpoenaed under subsection (d) of this section are located outside of this state, the person to whom the subpoena is issued shall make the materials available to the state auditor at a convenient location. If any party fails or refuses to obey a subpoena or to provide testimony as required under subsection (d) of this section, the attorney general may, upon reasonable notice to all affected persons, apply to the district court for an order compelling compliance.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days of the issuance of subpoena pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the attorney general shall disclose to the party or parties investigated that the investigation took place and the reasons for it.

The state auditor shall:

Make a full report of any investigation conducted under subsections (d) and (e) of this section;

Maintain the report made under paragraph (g)(i) of this section in his files;

Annually report to the legislature on the number, location by county and general extent of the investigations.

The state auditor shall have the authority to obtain the financial and criminal background of an employee or employment applicant of the state auditor in accordance with W.S.

7-19-106

and

7-19-201

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part II, § 3; Laws 1882, ch. 3, § 27; R.S. 1887, §§ 1695, 1733; R.S. 1899, §§ 71, 79; C.S. 1910, §§ 108, 116; C.S. 1920, §§ 118, 126; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-302, 109-310; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-303, 18-527; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-59, 9-69; Laws 1971, ch. 15, § 1; 1975, ch. 7, § 1; ch. 130, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-307, 9-2-331; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 6, § 1; 1985, ch. 137, § 1; 1989, ch. 210, § 2; 1991, ch. 123, § 1; 1992, ch. 41, § 1; 1994, ch. 70, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 1999, ch. 189, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 132, § 2; 2005, ch. 181, § 1; 2008, ch. 7, § 1; 2013 ch. 139, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to distribution and use of government royalty revenue, see §

9-4-601

et seq.

For constitutional provision as to prohibited appropriation, see art. 3, § 36, Wyo. Const.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (c)(viii).

The 2005 amendment,

in (b)(v), inserted “except for contracts of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) or less which are entered into by the office of an elected state official.”

Laws 2005, ch. 181, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (h).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (b)(vi), (b)(vii) and (c)(ix).

The 2020 amendment,

effective October 1, 2020, in (b)(v), substituted “contracts for capital construction projects entered into by an agency under W.S.

9-2-3006

and contracts of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) or less” for “contracts of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) or less”; and added (b)(viii).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, in the second sentence of (a)(viii), added "state" and substituted "department" for "division."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote (a)(v), which read, "Make a preliminary annual financial report of the fiscal affairs of the state to the governor, president of the senate, speaker of the house, and cochairmen of the joint appropriations committee, on or before September 30 of each year. The state auditor shall provide a final annual report on or before December 15. The report shall include financial statements which shall be prepared, insofar as practical, in conformance with generally accepted accounting principles."

To “audit and settle” vouchers,

the auditor must determine that they have been properly approved by competent authority, that the legislature has duly appropriated funds for the purpose for which the vouchers are drawn, and that the claim is a proper charge against the appropriate state fund. State ex rel. R. R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1947).

Presentation of claim as condition precedent. —

The presentation of a claim to the proper auditing officer is a condition precedent to the right to sue. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Review of disallowance of claim. —

The state auditor's disallowance of a claim is reviewable by the supreme court. State ex rel. Jeffrey v. Burdick, 3 Wyo. 588, 28 P. 146,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1891).

Quoted

in

Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 582 P.2d 583,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-1-404.
Specified claims against state to be presented within one year.

Except as provided by W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, persons having claims against the state shall document the claim and submit it to the state auditor within one (1) year after the claim accrues, to be audited, settled and acted upon.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part IV, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 1704; R.S. 1899, § 74; C.S. 1910, § 111; C.S. 1920, § 121; R.S. 1931, § 109-305; C.S. 1945, § 18-506; W.S. 1957, § 9-71; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-332; Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Purpose of section. —

The principal purpose of statues such as this section is to give a public entity timely notice of the nature of claims against it so that it may investigate and settle those of merit without litigation. Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, 582 P.2d 583,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1978).

This section is not a statute of limitation

in the same sense as those enumerated in §§

1-3-105

to

1-3-114

. This section is a limitation on filing a claim, not a limitation on filing an action. Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

Presentation of claim is condition precedent. —

Presentation of claim to the proper auditing officer is a condition precedent to the right to sue thereon. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933); Price v. State Highway Comm'n, 62 Wyo. 385, 167 P.2d 309,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1946).

A formal claim, in proper form, exhibited to the state auditor, is a condition precedent to the filing of an action against the state of Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

Failure to show claim is fatal defect. —

In an action against state highway department on a construction contract, the petition is fatally defective where it does not show that claim was filed in time with proper auditing officer. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Notice of claim in intergovernmental relationships. —

If it were to be determined that a notice of claim is required in intergovernmental relationships, which decision is not presently made, the time commences when the authorizing agency computes and advises whatever sum will be paid or withheld and why. Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

A notice of claim was made in a timely manner and, therefore, the court again did not decide whether a notice of claim is required in intergovernmental suits that do not fall within the parameters of the Governmental Claims Act. Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. Catchpole, 6 P.3d 1275,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Board of Trustees v. Bell, 662 P.2d 410,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Brasel & Sims Constr. Co. v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 655 P.2d 265,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 418

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Britton v. Halliburton Servs., 895 P.2d 45,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For case note, “Filing of Claims Against the State: Is ‘Almost’ Good Enough? Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 582 P.2d 583,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 259 (1979).

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Attorney's mistake or neglect as excuse for failing to file timely notice of tort claim against state governmental unit, 55 ALR3d 930.

Persons or entities upon whom notice of injury or claim against state or state agencies may or must be served, 45 ALR5th 173.

§ 9-1-405.
Setoffs in suits by state.

In all suits brought in behalf of the state no debt or claim shall be allowed against the state as a setoff unless:

The debts or claims were exhibited to the auditor and by him allowed or disallowed; or

It is proved to the court that the defendant at the time of trial possesses vouchers which he could not produce to the auditor or that he was prevented from exhibiting the claim to the auditor by absence from the state, sickness or accidents.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part IV, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 1705; R.S. 1899, § 3549; C.S. 1910, § 4395; C.S. 1920, § 5665; R.S. 1931, § 89-1020; C.S. 1945, § 18-507; W.S. 1957, § 9-72; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-333; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming,” see 7 Land & Water L. Rev. 229 (1972).

§ 9-1-406.
Taking evidence concerning settlement of accounts.

Except as provided by W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, the state auditor may examine the parties, witnesses or others, on oath or affirmation, relating to any matters material to the settlement of accounts, including information which is declared confidential by law, and for that purpose may issue subpoenas and compel witnesses to attend before him and give evidence in the same manner and by the same means allowed by law to courts of record. The state auditor shall take all reasonable measures necessary to protect the confidentiality of all confidential information obtained pursuant to this section.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part IV, § 9; R.S. 1887, § 1706; R.S. 1899, § 75; C.S. 1910, § 112; C.S. 1920, § 122; R.S. 1931, § 109-306; C.S. 1945, § 18-508; W.S. 1957, § 9-73; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-334; Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1992, ch. 41, § 1.

Presentation of claim as condition precedent. —

The presentation of a claim to the proper auditing officer is a condition precedent to the right to sue thereon. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Quoted

in

Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 582 P.2d 583,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Filing of Claims Against the State: Is ‘Almost’ Good Enough? Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 582 P.2d 583,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 259 (1979).

§ 9-1-407.
Certificate of auditor's decision; claims against state in absence of appropriation or authorization.

At the request of a person who is dissatisfied with the decision of the auditor on any claim, account or credit except as provided by W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, the auditor shall certify his findings and decision.

Except as provided by W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, when the law recognizes a claim for money against this state and no appropriation or authorization is made by law to pay the claim, upon demand, the auditor shall audit and adjust the claim and give the claimant a certificate of the amount of the claim.

The auditor shall report claims under this section to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate. The auditor shall pay the claim if an appropriation is made for that purpose.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part IV, §§ 13, 14; R.S. 1887, §§ 1710, 1711; R.S. 1899, §§ 80, 81; C.S. 1910, §§ 117, 118; C.S. 1920, §§ 127, 128; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-311, 109-312; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-512, 18-513; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-75, 9-76; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-335, 9-2-336; Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Exhaustion of remedies. —

Nothing in subsection (a) requires a person who is dissatisfied with the decision of an auditor to request certification of findings and, therefore, there can be no failure to exhaust administrative remedies for failing to request findings. Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. Catchpole, 6 P.3d 1275,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

State v. Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 313, 33 P. 992,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1892); State ex rel. Henderson v. Burdick, 4 Wyo. 272, 33 P. 125,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 11

, 24 L.R.A. 266 (1893).

§ 9-1-408.
Payment by auditor's warrants.

When accounts are audited and allowed against the state, or grants, salaries, pay and expenses are allowed by law, the auditor shall draw a warrant on the treasurer for the amount due if money is legally available to pay the claim.

Upon satisfactory proof being presented to the state auditor that any warrant drawn on the state treasury has been lost or destroyed before having been paid, the state auditor shall issue a duplicate warrant therefor. The state auditor may require a bond to be executed, or security approved by him, payable to the state of Wyoming, in the penalty of the amount of the warrant and conditioned to save harmless the state from any loss occasioned by the issuing of the duplicate warrant.

Upon satisfactory proof being presented to the state auditor that any warrant drawn on the state treasury has been stolen, forged and then paid, the state auditor may issue a duplicate warrant to the payee, provided:

The payee affirms in writing under oath that the endorsed signature on the paid warrant is not that of the payee, the payee did not aid or abet the individual who stole and endorsed the warrant, and the payee will assist the state and law enforcement officials in determining who stole and forged the paid warrant; and

The payee, if entitled to any future payments from the state, agrees that future payments will be reduced by the amount of the forged warrant, should it be discovered that the payee provided false information pursuant to this subsection.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part IV, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 1708; R.S. 1899, § 77; C.S. 1910, § 114; C.S. 1920, § 124; R.S. 1931, § 109-308; C.S. 1945, § 18-510; W.S. 1957, § 9-77; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-337; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1992, ch. 41, § 1.

Salary of state examiner. —

Where the salary of state examiner was fixed in the act creating the office, no special appropriation by the legislature of the amount of his salary was required. State ex rel. Henderson v. Burdick, 4 Wyo. 272, 33 P. 125,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1893).

§ 9-1-409.
State treasurer; duties generally; demand accounts; state revenues paid to treasurer.

The state treasurer shall:

Receive and keep all monies of the state not required by law to be received and kept by another state official;

Pay all warrants duly and legally issued by the auditor so long as there are in his hands funds sufficient to pay the warrants;

Keep a just, true and comprehensive account of all money received and disbursed;

Have general responsibility for the management of state cash resources, including developing information in conjunction with the state auditor, to forecast the cash needs of the state;

Be responsible for the investment of state funds.

The state treasurer may use demand accounts to pay warrants or to pay for investments. A record of the use of demand accounts shall be created and maintained in the treasurer’s office.

Every state officer, employee, department or commission receiving revenue for or on behalf of the state from any source shall pay all revenue to the state treasurer as directed by him.

The state treasurer may employ legal counsel to review contracts entered into by the state treasurer in his official capacity and perform other duties as assigned by the state treasurer. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the state treasurer from using the services of the attorney general’s office.

The state treasurer may implement and administer a performance compensation plan in accordance with this subsection. The plan shall:

Be limited to those at-will employees of the state treasurer’s office listed in paragraph (ii) of this subsection who are directly engaged in investing assets of the state;

Be limited to the following participating employees:

Chief investment officer;

Senior investment officer;

Investment officer;

Senior analyst;

Analyst.

Seek to maximize total returns net of fees on investments authorized by law and in the best interest of the state;

Be based solely on investment performance exceeding investment benchmarks as established by the investment funds committee created by W.S.

9-4-720

for each fund and asset class for an investment period. No performance compensation shall be paid under the plan unless the investment funds committee determines that the established benchmarks have been exceeded;

Measure investment performance during an investment period based on the following:

Fifty percent (50%) related to total fund performance. For purposes of this subsection, “total fund” means the total or overall investment portfolio of funds managed by the state treasurer’s office, excluding the following:

Funds invested for a specific public purpose;

Investments specifically directed by the state treasurer or state loan and investment board and not made at the recommendation of participating employees.

Fifty percent (50%) related to the performance of the employee’s individual assigned asset classes.

Provide that payments for investment performance for any one (1) investment period shall be as follows:

For payments earned in fiscal year 2020 – the investment performance beginning July 1, 2019 and ending June 30, 2020;

For payments earned in fiscal year 2021 – the arithmetic average of the investment performance beginning July 1, 2019 and ending June 30, 2020 and the investment performance beginning July 1, 2020 and ending June 30, 2021;

For payments earned in fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter – the arithmetic average of the annual investment performance beginning that fiscal year and the two (2) immediately preceding fiscal years.

Be funded from investment returns, with each invested fund’s share calculated in proportion to the magnitude of aggregate investment earnings of each fund invested, including interest and dividends, which shall be continuously appropriated for payment of performance compensation as authorized by this subsection;

Include a limit for total payments to all participating employees for performance compensation earned in any one (1) investment period in an amount not to exceed two percent (2%) of net investment returns above the established benchmark of the total fund for that investment period for payments pursuant to subparagraph (v)(A) of this subsection and two percent (2%) of net investment returns above the established benchmark of the employee’s individual assigned asset classes for that investment period for payments pursuant to subparagraph (v)(B) of this subsection;

Include a limit for total payments to an individual employee for performance compensation earned in any one (1) investment period in an amount not to exceed the following:

One hundred percent (100%) of a chief investment officer’s base salary;

Seventy-five percent (75%) of a senior investment officer’s base salary;

Fifty percent (50%) of an investment officer’s base salary;

Twenty-five percent (25%) of a senior analyst’s or analyst’s base salary.

Provide that performance compensation earned in any one (1) investment period will be paid over a three (3) year period as follows:

Twenty-five percent (25%) during the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the performance compensation was earned;

Twenty-five percent (25%) during the second fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the performance compensation was earned;

Fifty percent (50%) during the third fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the performance compensation was earned.

Provide that performance compensation shall be forfeited by an employee upon termination of employment subject to an anti-compete agreement for future employment related to asset management. This paragraph shall not apply to termination based on death, disability or retirement;

Provide that performance compensation shall not be included as compensation for the purpose of computing retirement or pension benefits earned by the employee;

Subject participating employees to the following terms and conditions related to leave time:

Chief investment officers, senior investment officers and investment officers shall receive leave time in the same manner and amount as department directors under W.S. 9-2-1706(b);

Senior analysts and analysts shall receive leave time in accordance with standards and rules established or promulgated in accordance with W.S. 9-2-3207(a).

Provide that performance compensation shall only be based on performance criteria occurring on or after the execution of an employment contract in accordance with this subsection. No performance compensation shall be paid other than as provided in the employment contract;

Be submitted to the joint appropriations committee and the select committee on capital financing and investments for comment, and approved by the human resources division, prior to implementation. The human resources division shall not disapprove a performance compensation plan which complies with the requirements of this subsection;

Be submitted and administered by the state treasurer as a separately designated and appropriated budget unit.

The state treasurer shall report to the joint appropriations committee and the select committee on capital financing and investments by November 1 of each year on the plan authorized by subsection (e) of this section. The report shall include:

Payments and methodology of calculating payments under the plan;

A measurement quantifying the risk resulting from the variation between the prior year’s investment benchmarks and the prior year’s actual investments;

An estimate of future payments under the plan and future expected investment benchmarks.

The state treasurer shall have the authority to obtain the financial and criminal background history of an employee, intern or applicant for employment of the state treasurer’s office.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part III, § 1; Laws 1882, ch. 3, § 28; ch. 104, § 4; R.S. 1887, §§ 1696, 1734; R.S. 1899, §§ 86, 87; Laws 1907, ch. 30, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 123, 124, 2486; C.S. 1920, §§ 131, 132, 2949; R.S. 1931, §§ 92-101, 109-402, 109-403; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-401, 18-528, 20-1001; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-57, 9-79, 9-586; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 7, § 1; ch. 8, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-2-306

, 9-2-350, 9-7-1101; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 186, § 2; 2004, ch. 132, § 2; 2019 ch. 57, § 1, effective February 19, 2019; 2020 ch. 8, § 1, effective March 5, 2020; 2020 ch. 82, § 2, effective March 13, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

For provision that claim shall be paid by auditor's warrants, see §

9-1-408

.

As to penalty for refusing to pay lawful warrant, see §

9-1-412

.

For constitutional provision that money shall be expended only on appropriation, see art, 3, § 35, Wyo. Const.

As to prohibited appropriations, see art. 3, § 36, Wyo. Const.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (d).

The 2019 amendment

added (e) and (f).

Laws 2019, ch. 57, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary to a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Became law without signature February 19, 2019.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 8, § 1, added (g).

Laws 2020, ch. 8, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment,
by ch. 82, § 2, added (a)(v).

Laws 2020, ch. 82, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3207(a)" for "9-2-1022(a)" in (e)(xiii)(B).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Applied

in

State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(1924).

Cited

in

State v. Gramm, 7 Wyo. 329, 52 P. 533,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 8

, 40 L.R.A. 690 (1898); MacDougall v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 48 Wyo. 493, 49 P.2d 663,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1935); State v. Holly Sugar Corp., 57 Wyo. 272, 116 P.2d 847,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1941).

§ 9-1-410.
Receipts for monies paid into treasury.

The treasurer shall issue receipts for all monies paid into the treasury. A copy of each receipt shall immediately be deposited by the treasurer with the auditor.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part III, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1697; Laws 1890-91, ch. 29, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 170; C.S. 1910, § 248; C.S. 1920, § 288; R.S. 1931, § 109-1401; C.S. 1945, § 18-402; W.S. 1957, § 9-80; Laws 1975, ch. 10, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-351; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-411.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 195, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 93, §§ 1 through 3, related to the state investment advisory council.